North Dakota, session 69, HB1255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Public broadcasting - Use of public funds restricted.
A state officer as defined in section 54 - 16 - 00.1 may not expend any state funds or federa l
funds available to the state officer to directly or indirectly support public broadcasting.
Page No. 1 25.0762.01000